Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 13 Partnerships [Repealed]

§§ 17-13-101 through 17-13-615.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 2.

Cross references. —

For Uniform Partnership Act, see chapter 21 of this title.

Editor's notes. —

This chapter (§§

17-13-101

through 17-13-615) derived from Laws 1917, ch. 97, §§ 1 through 43.